District of Columbia statutes.
9-1002

Purpose.

(a)

It is therefore declared to be the purpose of the Congress in this chapter to authorize the transfer of operating responsibility under long-term lease of the 2 Metropolitan Washington Airport properties as a unit, including access highways and other related facilities, to a properly constituted independent airport authority created by the Commonwealth of Virginia and the District of Columbia, in order to achieve local control, management, operation, and development of these important transaction assets.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the Airports Authority and the State of Maryland from entering into an agreement whereby Baltimore/Washington International Airport may be made part of a regional airports authority, subject to terms and conditions agreed to by the Airports Authority, the Secretary, the Commonwealth of Virginia, the District of Columbia, and the State of Maryland.

Oct. 30, 1986, 100 Stat. 3341-376, Pub. L. 99-591, § 6003
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-1001.
1981 Ed., § 7-1502.